src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Livonian Verb inflection
! ---------------
!! This file documents the verb inflection of Livonian.


!! ## Verb stem classes
LEXICON V_
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = CONJUGATION TYPE MISSING
: # ;

LEXICON TV_
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = CONJUGATION TYPE MISSING
+TV: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_VȰLDA
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ =  10 vȱlda:ZERO
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:uʼm K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:ūod K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg3:uʼm K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:ūomõ K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:ūom K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:ūotõ K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:ātõ K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:attõ K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:āt K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl3:at K ;
+Ind+Conneg+Sg:ūo K ;
+Ind+Conneg+Pl1:ūomõ K ;
+Ind+Conneg+Pl2:ūotõ K ;
+Ind+Conneg+Pl3:ūotõ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:vȯʼļ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:vȯʼļd K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:vȯʼļ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:vȯʼļmõ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:vȯʼļtõ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:vȯʼļțõ K ; ! variant 2023_08_9
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:vȯʼļtõ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:vȯʼļțõ K ; ! variant 2023_08_9
+Cnd+Conneg:vȯlks K ;
+Cnd+Sg1:vȯlks K ;
+Cnd+Sg2:vȯlkst K ;
+Cnd+Sg3:vȯlks K ;
+Cnd+Pl1:vȯlksmõ K ;
+Cnd+Pl2:vȯlkstõ K ;
+Cnd+Pl3:vȯlkstõ K ;
+Jus+Sg:vȯlkõ K ;
+Jus+Conneg+Sg:vȯlkõ K ;
+Jus+Pl:vȯlkõ K ;
+Jus+Conneg+Pl:vȯlkõ K ;
+Quo+Sg:vȯʼļļi K ;
+Quo+Pl:vȯʼļļi K ;
+Quo+Pl:vȯʼļļid K ;
+Ind+PrcPrs+Sg:vȯnd K ;
+Ind+PrcPrs+Pl:vȯnnõd K ;
+Imprt+Sg2:vȯʼl K ;
+Imprt+Pl2:vȯʼlgid K ;


LEXICON IV_VȰLDA
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 10 vȱlda: goes to **K**
+IV: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_LǞʼDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 1 lǟʼdõ:lǟʼ
: K ;

LEXICON IV_LǞʼDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 1 lǟʼdõ:lǟʼ
+IV: K ;

LEXICON TV_TǬʼDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 2 tǭʼdõ:tǭʼ
: V-01_TǬʼDÕ ;
!+TV: V-01_TǬʼDÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_VĪDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 3 vīdõ:vī
: V-01_VĪDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_VĪDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 3 vīdõ:vī
!+IV: V-01_VĪDÕ ;
: V-01_VĪDÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VĪDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 3 vīdõ:vī
!+TV: V-01_VĪDÕ ;
: V-01_VĪDÕ ;

!LEXICON IV_NǞʼDÕ
! 4 nǟʼdõ:nǟʼ
!+IV: V-01_NǞʼDÕ ;

LEXICON TV_NǞʼDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 4 nǟʼdõ:nǟʼ
!! * Yaml: **naeaeqdw**
!+TV: V-01_NǞʼDÕ ;
: V-01_NǞʼDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KǞʼDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 5 kǟʼdõ:kǟʼ
!+IV: K ; FIXME 20230902
: K ;

LEXICON TV_TĪʼEDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 6 tīʼedõ:tīʼe
!+TV: K ; FIXME 20230902
: K ;


LEXICON V-AUX_SĪEDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 7 sīedõ:sīe
: V-01_SĪEDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_SĪEDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 7 sīedõ:sīe
!+IV: V-01_SĪEDÕ ;
: V-01_SĪEDÕ ;

LEXICON TV_SĪEDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 7 sīedõ:sīe
!+TV: V-01_SĪEDÕ ;
: V-01_SĪEDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_SǬDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 8 sǭdõ:s
!+IV: V-01_SǬDÕ ;
: V-01_SǬDÕ ;

LEXICON TV_SǬDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 8 sǭdõ:s
!+TV: V-01_SǬDÕ ;
: V-01_SǬDÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_SǬDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 8 sǭdõ:s
: V-01_SǬDÕ ;

!LEXICON IV_JŪODÕ
! 9 jūodõ:jūo
!+IV: V-01_JŪODÕ ;

LEXICON TV_JŪODÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 9 jūodõ:jūo
!+TV: V-01_JŪODÕ ;
: V-01_JŪODÕ ;

LEXICON IV_TŪLDA
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 11 tūlda:
+IV: K ; !FIXME 20230902

LEXICON V-AUX_PĀNDA
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 12 pānda:
: K ; !FIXME	20230902

LEXICON IV_PĀNDA
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 12 pānda:
+IV: K ; !FIXME	20230902

LEXICON TV_PĀNDA
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 12 pānda:
+TV: K ; !FIXME	20230902

LEXICON IV_JEʼLLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 13 jeʼllõ:jeʼlā
!+IV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;
: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_JEʼLLÕ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ =  13 jeʼllõ:jeʼllõ
!+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;
: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ASTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 18 astõ:astõ
!+IV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;
: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ASTÕ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ =  18 astõ:astõ
!+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;
: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VÕTTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 19 võttõ:võttõ
!+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;
: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_VIEʼDDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 24 vieʼddõ:vieʼddõ
!+IV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;
: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VIEʼDDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 24 vieʼddõ:vieʼddõ
!+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;
: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MAKSÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 25 maksõ:maksõ
!+IV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;
: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MAKSÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 25 maksõ:maksõ
!+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;
: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_TAPPÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 26 tappõ:tappõ
!+TV: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;
: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MÄNGÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 14 mängõ:mǟnga
!+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KILLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 15 killõ:kīla
!+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_KILLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_PALLÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 16 pallõ:pǭla
!+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_PALLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LOULÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 17 loulõ:lōla
!+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_LOULÕ ;

LEXICON IV_LAITÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 20 laittõ:lāita
!+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_LAITÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LAITÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 20 laittõ:lāita
!+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_LAITÕ ;

LEXICON IV_TÄUTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 21 täutõ:tǟta
!+IV: V-01_TÄUTÕ ;
: V-01_TÄUTÕ ;

LEXICON TV_TÄUTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 21 täutõ:tǟuta
!+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_TÄUTÕ ;

!LEXICON IV_PȮĻTÕ
! 22 pȯļtõ:pūoļta
!+IV: V-01_PȮĻTÕ ;

LEXICON TV_PȮĻTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 22 pȯļtõ:pūoļta
!+TV: V-01_PȮĻTÕ ;
: V-01_PȮĻTÕ ;

!LEXICON IV_MȮISTÕ
! 23 mȯistõ:mūošta
!+IV: V-01_MȮISTÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MȮISTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 23 mȯistõ:mūošta
!+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_MȮISTÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ANDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 27 andõ:ānda
!+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ANDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 27 andõ:ānda
!+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_TIEUDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 28 tieudõ:tīeda
!+IV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_TIEUDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = 28 tieudõ:tīeda
!+TV: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;
: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

!! 29-48 follow same pattern

LEXICON IV_LUʼGGÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = luʼggõ:luʼggõ 29
!+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LUʼGGÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = luʼggõ:lugū 29
!+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MUʼDŽÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = muʼdžõ:mudžū 30
!+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MUʼDŽÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = muʼdžõ:mudžū 30
!+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_VAKȚÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = vakțõ:vakțū 31
!+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ      ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VAKȚÕ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ =  vakțõ:vakțū 31
!+TV:	V-01_LUʼGGÕ	;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KITTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kittõ:kitū 32
!+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KITTÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kittõ:kitū 32
!+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_RIʼDDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = riʼddõ:ridū 33
!:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_RIʼDDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = riʼddõ:ridū 33
!+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_RIʼDDÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = riʼddõ:ridū 33
!+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KUTSÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kutsõ:kutsū 34
!+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KUTSÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kutsõ:kutsū 34
!+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_LASKÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = laskõ:laskū 35
!:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_LASKÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = laskõ:laskū 35
!+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LASKÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = laskõ:laskū 35
!+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_AKKÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = akkõ:akū 36
!! Should ss be s and šš be š? 2013-02-19
!+IV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_AKKÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = akkõ:akū 36
!+TV:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;
:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;


LEXICON V-AUX_AIGÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = aigõ:āigõ 37
:	V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_AIGÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = aigõ:āigõ 37
!+IV:  V-01_AIGÕ ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_AIGÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = aigõ:āigõ 37
!+TV:  V-01_AIGÕ ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KUOŖŖÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = kuoŗŗõ:kūoŗõ 38
!+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VANNÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = vannõ:vǭnõ 39
!+TV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_PȮĻĻÕ
!!  **LEXICON @LEXNAME@ = pȯļļõ:pūoļõ 40
!+IV:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;
:  V-01_AIGÕ ;
