src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
eitõ+V:eitõ IV_TÄUTÕ  "heittäytyä" ;
gaḑḑõ+V+Aux:gaʼḑḑõ V-AUX_RIʼDDÕ  "sattua" ;
istõ+V:istõ IV_ASTÕ  "istua" ;
jellõ+V:jeʼllõ IV_JEʼLLÕ  "asua" ;
joudõ+V:joudõ IV_TIEUDÕ  "joutua" ;
kaddõ+V:kaʼddõ IV_RIʼDDÕ  "katoa" ;
kazzõ+V:kaʼzzõ IV_JEʼLLÕ  "kasvaa" ;
killõ+V:killõ TV_KILLÕ  "kylvää" ;
kilmõ+V:kilmõ IV_MÄNGÕ  "jäätyä" ;
kindõ+V:kindõ TV_ANDÕ  "kyntää" ;
kittõ+V:kittõ TV_VÕTTÕ  "lämmittää" ;
kiddõ+V:kiʼddõ TV_RIʼDDÕ  "perata" ;
kopsõ+V:kopsõ IV_KUTSÕ  "käydä" ;
kouvõ+V:kōuvõ TV_LOULÕ  "puskea" ;
kruppõ+V:kruppõ IV_AKKÕ  "rupeutua" ;
kuostõ+V:kuostõ IV_ASTÕ  "vastata" ;
kuostõ+V:kuostõ IV_VAKȚÕ  "parantua" ;
kuddõ+V:kuʼddõ IV_RIʼDDÕ  "tehdä kennoja" ;
kīedõ+V:kīe IV_SĪEDÕ  "kiehua" ;
kǟdõ+V:kǟʼ IV_KǞʼDÕ  "käydä" ;
lakkõ+V:lakkõ TV_TAPPÕ  "latkia" ;
laskõ+V:laskõ TV_LASKÕ  "laskea" ;
laggõ+V:laʼggõ IV_LUʼGGÕ  "laajentua" ;
lieudõ+V:lieudõ TV_TIEUDÕ  "löytää" ;
liltõ+V:liltõ TV_LAITÕ  "puhaltaa pilliin" ;
lindõ+V:lindõ IV_ANDÕ  "lentää" ;
loptõ+V:loptõ TV_ASTÕ  "lopettaa" ;
loulõ+V:lōulõ TV_LOULÕ  "laulaa" ;
luggõ+V:luʼggõ TV_LUʼGGÕ  "lukea" ;
läppõ+V:läppõ IV_AKKÕ  "ummehtua" ;
līdõ+V:lī TV_VĪDÕ  "olema" ;
lūodõ+V:lūo TV_JŪODÕ  "luoda" ;
lǟdõ+V:lǟʼ IV_LǞʼDÕ  "mennä" ;
lǟdõ+V+Aux:lǟʼ V-AUX_LǞʼDÕ  "täytyä" ;
meḑḑõ+V:meʼḑḑõ TV_RIʼDDÕ  "metsästää" ;
motskõ+V:motskõ TV_KUTSÕ  "muovata" ;
mudžõ+V:muʼdžõ IV_MUʼDŽÕ  "vilistä" ;
mudžõ+V:muʼdžõ TV_MUʼDŽÕ  "panna sekaisin" ;
mängõ+V:mängõ IV_MÄNGÕ  "leikkiä" ;
märgõ+V:mǟrgõ IV_AIGÕ  "lahota" ;
mīdõ+V:mī TV_VĪDÕ  "myydä" ;
mȯistõ+V:mȯistõ TV_MȮISTÕ  "osata" ;
nielgõ+V:nīelgõ TV_AIGÕ  "hotkia" ;
nuttõ+V:nuttõ TV_VÕTTÕ  "nimetä" ;
nuššõ+V:nuššõ TV_AKKÕ  "paritella" ;
nǟdõ+V:nǟʼ TV_NǞʼDÕ  "nähdä" ;
paistõ+V:pāistõ IV_LAITÕ  "paistaa" ;
pallõ+V:pǭla TV_PALLÕ  "pyytää" ;
pattõ+V:pattõ IV_KITTÕ  "tehdä syntiä" ;
paggõ+V:paʼggõ IV_LUʼGGÕ  "rakoilla" ;
peistõ+V:peistõ TV_TÄUTÕ  "lämmittää" ;
petšõ+V:petšõ TV_MAKSÕ  "piestä" ;
pieksõ+V:pieksõ IV_MAKSÕ  "hakata" ;
pieksõ+V:pieksõ TV_MAKSÕ  "parkita" ;
piddõ+V:piʼddõ IV_VIEʼDDÕ  "pitää kiinni" ;
piddõ+V:piʼddõ TV_VIEʼDDÕ  "pitää" ;
plettõ+V:plettõ TV_KITTÕ  "silittää" ;
postõ+V:postõ TV_VAKȚÕ  "kyyditä" ;
pretsõ+V:pretsõ IV_KUTSÕ  "avioitua" ;
puļļõ+V:puʼļļõ TV_LUʼGGÕ  "märehtiä" ;
pānda+V:pānda IV_PĀNDA  "heittäytyä" ;
pānda+V:pānda TV_PĀNDA  "panna" ;
pānda+V+Aux:pānda V-AUX_PĀNDA  "saada" ;
pūoldõ+V:pūoldõ TV_  "puoltaa" ;
pȯļļõ+V:pūoļõ IV_PȮĻĻÕ  "rämpiä" ;
pȯļțõ+V:pȯļțõ TV_PȮĻTÕ  "puida viljaa" ;
rištõ+V:rištõ IV_VAKȚÕ  "tehdä ristinmerkki" ;
saddõ+V:saʼddõ IV_VIEʼDDÕ  "pudota" ;
seļţõ+V:seļţõ IV_LAITÕ  "kirkastua" ;
seļţõ+V:seļţõ TV_LAITÕ  "selittää" ;
sittõ+V:sittõ TV_KITTÕ  "paskantaa" ;
siddõ+V:siʼddõ TV_VIEʼDDÕ  "sitoa" ;
smekkõ+V:smekkõ TV_AKKÕ  "maistaa" ;
spitšõ+V:spitšõ TV_KUTSÕ  "teroittaa" ;
sõvvõ+V:sõʼvvõ TV_JEʼLLÕ  "raapia" ;
sīedõ+V:sīe TV_SĪEDÕ  "syödä" ;
sōdõ+V:s IV_SǬDÕ  "päästä" ;
sōdõ+V:s TV_SǬDÕ  "saada" ;
sōdõ+V+Aux:s V-AUX_SǬDÕ  "voida" ;
tappõ+V:tappõ TV_TAPPÕ  "tappaa" ;
tarmõ+V+Aux:tārmõ V-AUX_AIGÕ  "haluta" ;
taggõ+V:taʼggõ TV_JEʼLLÕ  "takoa (päähän)" ;
teļļõ+V:teļõ TV_KUOŖŖÕ  "pohtia" ;
teļļõ+V:teļõ TV_KUOŖŖÕ  "teeskennellä" ;
tieudõ+V:tieudõ TV_TIEUDÕ  "tietää" ;
tingõ+V:tingõ TV_ANDÕ  "tonkia" ;
täutõ+V:tǟutõ TV_TÄUTÕ  "täyttää" ;
tīedõ+V:tīʼe TV_TĪʼEDÕ  "tehdä" ;
tūlda+V:tuʼlā IV_TŪLDA  "tulla" ;
tūodõ+V:tūo TV_JŪODÕ  "tuoda" ;
tōdõ+V:tǭʼ TV_TǬʼDÕ  "tahtoa" ;
ulztūlda+V:ulz#tuʼlā IV_TŪLDA  "ilmestyä" ;
ulzvȯstõ+V:ulz#vȯstõ TV_ASTÕ  "lunastaa" ;
uskõ+V:uskõ TV_LASKÕ  "uskoa" ;
uskõ+V+Aux:uskõ V-AUX_LASKÕ  "uskoa jollekulle" ;
vannõ+V:vǭnõ TV_VANNÕ  "kirota" ;
vaŗŗõ+V:vǭŗõ TV_VANNÕ  "piilottaa" ;
vektõ+V:vektõ TV_VAKȚÕ  "vaania" ;
viettõ+V:viettõ IV_KITTÕ  "vettyä" ;
virgõ+V:vīrgõ IV_AIGÕ  "herätä" ;
viskõ+V:viskõ IV_LASKÕ  "heittäytyä" ;
võidõ+V+Aux:või V-AUX_VĪDÕ  "voida" ;
vīdõ+V:vī TV_VĪDÕ  "viedä" ;
vȯidõ+V:vȯidõ IV_ANDÕ  "pysytellä" ;
vȯlkõd+V+Aux:vȯlkõd V-AUX_VȰLDA  "olkoot" ;
vȱlda+V+Aux:0 V-AUX_VȰLDA  "olla" ;
zingõ+V:zīngõ TV_AIGÕ  "laulaa iskelmiä" ;
īedõ+V:īe IV_SĪEDÕ  "jäädä" ;
īedõ+V+Aux:īe V-AUX_SĪEDÕ  "jäädä" ;
ūdõ+V:ū IV_VĪDÕ  "paistua" ;
